Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.142

Treasurer of board—Duties—Bond.

Each board of trustees shall appoint a treasurer who shall be the financial officer of the board and who shall hold office during the pleasure of the board. Each treasurer shall render a true and faithful account of all moneys received and paid out by him or her, comply with the provisions of RCW 28B.50.143, and shall give bond for the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office in such amount as the trustees require: PROVIDED, That the respective community and technical colleges shall pay the fees for any such bonds.

[ 1991 c 238 s 40; 1977 ex.s. c 331 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 331: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.